New Jersey, session 221, A2738.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  To the extent consistent with federal law and regulations of the federal agencies involved, all federal funding for coronavirus disease 2019 (COVID-19) relief, aid, or stimulus provided to the State to disburse to local governments in the form of a grant program, and not already dispersed, committed, or incurred as of the effective date of P.L.     , c.    (C.         ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), shall be disbursed proportionally according to population with no minimum population required to receive federal funding. b.    Prior to enactment of this section, the Department of the Treasury, in consultation with the Department of Community Affairs, the Department of Health, and the New Jersey Economic Development Authority, shall promulgate regulations pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), defining the new criteria for the grant programs, based on need, for local governments to apply.  The Department of the Treasury shall post the regulations on the departments Internet website. 2.    This act shall take effect 90 days after enactment and shall expire upon the disbursement of all federal COVID-19 grant monies for local governments. STATEMENT To the extent consistent with federal law and regulations of the federal agencies involved, all federal funding for COVID-19 relief, aid, or stimulus provided to the State to disburse to local governments in the form of a grant program, and not already dispersed, committed, or incurred as of the effective date of the bill, would be disbursed proportionally according to population with no minimum population required to receive federal funding. Prior to enactment of the bill, the Department of the Treasury, in consultation with the Department of Community Affairs, the Department of Health, and the New Jersey Economic Development Authority, would be required to promulgate regulations, and post the regulations on its Internet website, defining the new criteria for the grant programs, based on need, for local governments to apply. The bill would take effect 90 days after enactment and shall expire upon the disbursement of all federal COVID-19 grant monies for local governments.